Wyoming statutes. Title 34 Property, Conveyances and Security Transactions
Article 11. Central Filing System — Agricultural Products

§ 34-21-1101.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Buyer in the ordinary course of business” means a person who, in the ordinary course of business, buys farm products from a person engaged in farming operations who is in the business of selling farm products;

“Central filing system” means the system for filing effective financing statements or notice of those financing statements established under this act in response to section 1324 of the Food Security Act of 1985, Public Law 99-198, 7 U.S.C. § 1631 (Supp. 1988);

“Commission merchant” means any person engaged in the business of receiving any farm product for sale, on commission or for or on behalf of another person;

“Debtor” means the person subjecting a farm product to a security interest;

“Effective financing statement” means a statement that:

Is signed, authorized or otherwise authenticated by the secured party;

Is filed by the secured party in the office of the secretary of state;

Is signed, authorized or otherwise authenticated by the debtor;

Contains:

The name and address of the secured party;

The name and address of the debtor;

An approved unique identification number of the debtor;

A description of the farm products subject to the security interest created by the debtor, including the amount of such products where applicable;

Each county in this state where the debtor’s farm product is used or produced or to be used or produced;

Crop year, unless every crop of the farm product in question is to be subject to the particular security interest for the duration of the effective financing statement;

Further details of the farm product subject to the security interest if needed to distinguish it from other quantities of the product owned by the same person but not subject to the particular security interest; and

Other information that the secretary of state may require to comply with section 1324 of the Food Security Act of 1985, Public Law 99-198, 7 U.S.C. § 1631 (Supp. 1988), or to more efficiently carry out his duties under this act.

Shall be amended and filed, within three (3) months to reflect material changes;

Remains effective for a period of five (5) years from the date of filing, subject to extensions for additional periods of five (5) years each by refiling or filing a continuation statement within six (6) months before the expiration of the five (5) year period;

Lapses on either the expiration of the effective period of the statement or the filing of a notice signed, authorized or otherwise authenticated by the secured party that the statement is terminated, whichever occurs first;

Is accompanied by the filing fee required under this act; and

Substantially complies with the requirements of this paragraph even though it contains minor errors that are not seriously misleading. An effective financing statement may, for any given debtor or debtors, cover more than one (1) farm product located in more than one (1) county. However, should more than ten (10) products, counties or combinations thereof be listed, an additional fee shall be charged.

“Farm product” means an agricultural commodity, such as wheat, corn, soybeans or a species of livestock such as cattle, hogs, sheep, horses or poultry used or produced in farming operations, or a product of such crop or livestock in its unmanufactured state, such as woolclip, milk or eggs that is in the possession of a person engaged in farming operations;

“Knows” or “knowledge” means actual knowledge;

“Receipt of notice” of an existing security interest means, for purposes of section 1324 of the Food Security Act of 1985, Public Law 99-198, 7 U.S.C. § 1631 (Supp. 1988), and for purposes of this act, the earlier of:

The date notice is actually received by a buyer in the ordinary course of business;

The first day upon which delivery of the notice is attempted by a carrier; or

Five (5) days after the notice is mailed.

“Registrant” means any buyer of farm products, commission merchant, selling agent or other person who registers with the secretary of state to receive the master list;

“Security interest” means an interest in farm products that secures payment or performance of an obligation;

“Selling agent” means any person, other than a commission merchant, who is engaged in the business of negotiating the sale and purchase of any farm product on behalf of a person engaged in farming operations;

“This act” means W.S.

34-21-1101

through

34-21-1107

.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 235, § 1; 2014 ch. 56, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (a)(v)(A), substituted “signed, authorized or otherwise authenticated by the secured party” for “an original or reproduced copy thereof”; in (a)(v)(B), deleted “signed and” preceding “filed by the”; in (a)(v)(C), added “authorized or otherwise authenticated” preceding “by the debtor”; in (a)(v)(D)(III), substituted “An approved unique” for “The social security number of the debtor or, in the case of a debtor doing business other than as an individual, the United States Internal Revenue Service taxpayer”; in (a)(v)(E), substituted “and filed” for “in writing” and deleted “similarly signed and filed”; in the middle of the sentence in (a)(v)(G) added “authorized or otherwise authenticated.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subparagraph (a)(v)(I) or subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 34-21-1102.
Central filing system; establishment.

The secretary of state shall establish and operate a central filing system for effective financing statements. The system shall provide a means for filing effective financing statements or notices of such financing statements on a statewide basis. The system shall include requirements that:

An effective financing statement or notice of a financing statement shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state. A debtor’s residence is presumed to be the residence shown on the filing. The validity of the filing is not affected if the residence indicated is improper or inaccurate. The secretary of state shall mark the statement or notice with a consecutive file number and the date and hour of filing and shall hold the statement or notice for public inspection. In addition, the secretary of state shall index the statements and notices according to the name of the debtor and shall note in the index the file number and the address of the debtor given in the statement;

The secretary of state shall compile all statements or notices filed under this act into a master list containing the information specified in W.S. 34-21-1101(a)(v)(D);

The secretary of state shall distribute to registrants the information on the master list in lists by farm product arranged either alphabetically by debtor or numerically by the debtor’s approved unique identification number. If a registered buyer so requests, the list or lists for such buyer may be limited to any county or group of counties where the farm product is used or produced or to any crop year or years or a combination of those identifiers;

All buyers of farm products, commission merchants, selling agents and other persons may register with the secretary of state to receive lists described in paragraph (a)(iii) of this section. Lists produced under the central filing system shall be used only for the purposes of this act. Any buyer of farm products, commission merchant, selling agent or other person conducting business from multiple locations shall be considered as one (1) entity. Registration shall be on an annual calendar year basis. The secretary of state shall provide the form for registration which shall include the name and address of the registrant and the list or lists described in paragraph (a)(iii) of this section which the registrant desires to receive. The form shall also include other information that the secretary of state may require to comply with section 1324 of the Food Security Act of 1985, Public Law 99-198, 7 U.S.C. 1631 (Supp. 1988), or to more efficiently carry out his duties under this act. A registration shall not be completed until the form provided is properly completed and received by the secretary of state accompanied by the specified registration fee. A registrant shall pay an additional annual fee as specified under this act to receive monthly lists described in paragraph (a)(iii) of this section. A registration may be amended during the year by properly completing the prescribed form and submitting it along with the specified fee to the secretary of state. Registrants shall immediately notify the secretary of state of any change of address by filling out the proper form in order to continue to receive copies of the central filing system master list and to continue to be considered registered. The secretary of state shall maintain a record of the registrants and the lists and contents of the lists received by the registrants for a period of five (5) years;

The lists requested by registrants under paragraph (a)(iv) of this section shall be distributed by the secretary of state on a monthly basis and shall be in written or printed form. The secretary of state may by rule provide for the distribution of the lists on any medium and establish reasonable charges therefor. The secretary of state shall, by rule, establish the dates upon which the monthly distribution will be made, the dates after which a filing of an effective financing statement will not be reflected on the next monthly distribution of lists and the dates by which a registrant must complete a registration to receive the next monthly list; and

The secretary of state shall remove lapsed and terminated effective financing statements or notices of such financing statements from the master list before preparing the lists for distribution under paragraph (a)(v) of this section.

The secretary of state shall apply to the secretary of the United States department of agriculture for certification of the central filing system.

The secretary of state shall:

Adopt and promulgate rules to implement this act if necessary to obtain federal certification of the central filing system. Additional and alternative requirements made in conformity with section 1324 of the Food Security Act of 1985, Public Law 99-198, 7 U.S.C. § 1631 (Supp. 1988) and with the rules promulgated under it may be imposed by the secretary of state by rule;

Prescribe all forms to be used for filing effective financing statements and subsequent transactions and all other forms necessary to implement this act.

History:

Laws 1989, ch. 235, § 1; 2014 ch. 56, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in the fourth sentence in (a)(i), deleted “or a microfilm or other photographic copy thereof”; at the end of the first sentence in (a)(iii), substituted “approved unique” for “social security number for individual debtors or, in the case of debtors doing business other than as individuals, the United States Internal Revenue Service taxpayer identification number of such debtors”; in (a)(v), deleted the second sentence, which read “A registrant may choose in lieu of receiving a written or printed form to receive lists on microfiche.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 34-21-1101(a)(xii).

§ 34-21-1103.
Filing.

Presentation for filing of an effective financing statement, tender of the filing fee and the acceptance of the statement by the secretary of state constitutes filing under this act.

A continuation statement may be filed by the secured party within six (6) months immediately prior to the expiration of the five (5) year period specified in W.S. 34-21-1101(a)(v)(F). Any continuation statement shall identify the original statement by file number and state that the original statement is still effective. The continuation statement need not be signed by the secured party or the debtor, whether filed by electronic means or filed in written form. Upon timely filing of the continuation statement, the effectiveness of the original statement shall be continued for five (5) years after the last date to which the filing was effective whereupon it shall lapse unless another continuation statement is filed in accordance with this subsection. If an effective financing statement exists at the time insolvency proceedings are commenced by or against the debtor, the effective financing statement shall remain effective until termination of the insolvency proceedings and thereafter for a period of sixty (60) days or until the expiration of the five (5) year period, whichever occurs later. Succeeding continuation statements may be filed in the same manner to continue the effectiveness of the original statement.

History:

Laws 1989, ch. 235, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 20, § 1; 2014 ch. 56, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in the middle of the second sentence in (b), deleted “be signed by the secured party and the debtor or debtors,” and in (b) deleted the third sentence, which read “After the secretary of state receives approval from the United States department of agriculture that the amendment to the central filing system complies with section 1324 of the Food Security Act of 1985, Public Law 99 198, 7 U.S.C. § 1631.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 34-21-1101(a)(xii).

§ 34-21-1104.
Termination; notice.

Whenever there is no outstanding secured obligation and no commitment to make advances, incur obligations or otherwise give value, the secured party shall notify the debtor in writing of his right to have a notice of lapse of his effective financing statement filed which shall lead to the removal of his name from the files and lists compiled by the secretary of state. In lieu of that notice, the secured party may acquire a waiver of the debtor of that right and a request by the debtor that his effective financing statement be retained on file. The notice may be given or waiver acquired by the secured party at any time prior to the time specified in this subsection for giving the notice.

If the secured party does not furnish the notice or obtain the waiver specified in subsection (a) of this section, the secured party shall, within ten (10) days of final payment of all secured obligations, file a notice of termination with the secretary of state. The secured party shall on written demand by the debtor send the debtor a notice of termination to the effect that he no longer claims a security interest under the effective financing statement, which shall be identified by file number. The notice of termination is valid if signed by the secured party.

If the affected secured party fails to send a notice of lapse within ten (10) days after proper demand under subsection (b) of this section, he is liable to the debtor for the amount of one hundred dollars ($100.00) and for any loss caused to the debtor by the failure.

On presentation to the secretary of state of a notice of lapse, he shall treat it as a termination statement and note it in the index.

History:

Laws 1989, ch. 235, § 1; 2014 ch. 56, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (b), substituted “termination” for “lapse.” throughout.

§ 34-21-1105.
Information requests.

Oral and written inquiries regarding information provided by the filing of effective financing statements may be made at the office of the secretary of state during regular business hours or at such other times as the secretary of state may set. The secretary of state shall, within twenty-four (24) hours after the request, furnish oral confirmation of any effective financing statement in the system to any buyer of farm products buying from a debtor, commission merchant or selling agent selling for a seller covered by such statement. If requested, oral confirmation shall be followed by written confirmation mailed by the end of the next business day.

The secretary of state and his employees or agents are exempt from all liability as a result of any error or omission in providing information as required by this act, except in cases of willful misconduct or gross negligence.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 235, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 34.1-1-101.

§ 34-21-1106.
Sales subject to security interest; release of security interest.

In the case of a farm product produced in Wyoming, a buyer in the ordinary course of business buying farm products takes subject to a security interest created by the seller, and a commission merchant or selling agent who sells a farm product for others shall be subject to a security interest created by the seller in such farm product, if:

The buyer, commission merchant or selling agent has failed to register with the secretary of state prior to the purchase of farm products, and the secured party has filed an effective financing statement or notice that covers the farm products being sold; or

The buyer, commission merchant or selling agent received from the secretary of state written notice as provided in W.S. 34-21-1102(a)(v) that specifies both the seller and the farm products being sold by the seller as being subject to an effective financing statement or notice, and does not secure a waiver or release of the security interest specified in the effective financing statement or notice from the secured party by performing any payment obligation or otherwise. If a buyer in the ordinary course of business buying farm products covered by the central filing system tenders to the seller the total purchase price by means of a check or other instrument payable to the seller and each security interest holder of the seller identified in the central filing system for those products and if the security interest holder authorizes the negotiation of the check or other instrument, the authorization or endorsement and payment thereof constitutes a waiver or release of the security interest specified to the extent of the amount of the instrument.

A buyer in the ordinary course of business buying farm products covered by the central filing system shall take subject to the security interest identified under the system, except that a registrant or a buyer in the ordinary course of business making an inquiry under W.S.

34-21-1105

shall not take subject to the security interest if the central filing system’s failure to correctly provide any of the information specified in W.S. 34-21-1101(a)(v)(D) prevents the buyer from having knowledge of the effective financing statement.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 235, § 1.

§ 34-21-1107.
Fees.

The secretary of state shall, while determining appropriate fees under W.S. 34.1-9-525 for original financing statements, determine appropriate fees for effective financing statement filings, statements of amendments, continuation, assignment and release and for statements of termination by rules. The rules must be adopted in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 235, § 1; 1991, ch. 25, § 1; 2001, ch. 137, § 3.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).